Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-913
Bank holding company; registration required; when.

Every bank holding company shall register with the department within thirty days after the consummation of an action set forth in section 8-910 on forms provided by the department. The forms provided by the department shall include such information with respect to the financial condition, operations, management, and intercompany relationship of the bank holding company and its subsidiaries and related matters, as the director may deem necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995. Upon good cause shown, the director may, in his or her discretion, extend the time within which a bank holding company shall register. A bank holding company shall amend its registration within thirty days after any additional action under section 8-910, 8-911, or 8-912.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 24.